North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 35A. Comprehensive Transition Postsecondary (CTP) Scholarships.

§ 116-295.
Comprehensive Transition Postsecondary Scholarship Program established; administration of scholarships.

Program Established. — There is established the Comprehensive Transition Postsecondary (CTP) Scholarship Program to provide scholarships to full-time North Carolina students with intellectual disabilities enrolled in certificate accomplishment programs at constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina that are approved by the United States Department of Education as a CTP Program, pursuant to the Higher Education Opportunity Act of 2008, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1140f through 1140i.

Administration of the Program. — The University of North Carolina System Office shall administer the CTP Scholarship Program, in consultation and collaboration with the constituent institutions, pursuant to policies adopted by the governing body of the constituent institutions that are consistent with the requirements of this Article.

History.

2021-180, s. 8.16(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.16(b), made this Article, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.16(a), effective beginning with the 2022-2023 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-296.
Comprehensive Transition Postsecondary Scholarship Fund established; administration of fund.

Fund Established. — There is established the Comprehensive Transition Postsecondary (CTP) Scholarship Fund to be used to fund scholarships awarded pursuant to this Article. All funds appropriated for the program, all returned scholarship monies, and all interest earned on these funds shall be placed in the Fund. Scholarship funds that are unexpended at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain available for the award of scholarships under this Article.

Administration of Fund. — The University of North Carolina System Office, in collaboration with the constituent institutions, shall administer the CTP Scholarship Fund.

History.

2021-180, s 8.16(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.16(b), made this Article, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.16(a), effective beginning with the 2022-2023 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-297.
Student eligibility; award of scholarships.

Eligibility. — To be eligible for a scholarship under this Article, a student must meet all of the following conditions:

Qualify as a resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in

G.S. 116-143.1

and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency determination process administered by the State Education Assistance Authority.

Meet enrollment standards by being admitted, enrolled, and classified as a full-time student in the Integrative Community Studies CTP Program at the constituent institution.

Submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) and demonstrate need according to the federal methodology in Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 1070, et seq.

Award of Scholarships; Reduction to Award. — Subject to the availability of funds in the Comprehensive Transition Postsecondary (CTP) Scholarship Fund established under G.S. 116-316, scholarships shall be awarded to eligible students in an amount to cover the cost of attendance in the CTP program at the constituent institution. If a student who is eligible for a scholarship under this section also receives a scholarship or other grant covering the cost of attendance, then the amount of the scholarship shall be reduced by an appropriate amount determined by the constituent institution so that the total amount of scholarships and grants received by the student does not exceed the cost of attendance. The cost of attendance shall be determined by the constituent institution. In the event there are not sufficient funds available for scholarships for each eligible student to cover the cost of attendance, the constituent institution may adjust the distribution of the amount of scholarships as necessary in an academic year.

History.

2021-180, s. 8.16(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.16(b), made this Article, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.16(a), effective beginning with the 2022-2023 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§§ 116-298, 116-299.

Reserved for future codification purposes.